Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5298YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2195 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 52.39 Ballot labels. 1 1. Each commissioner shall label each ballot cast in the 2 county for each primary and general election. The label must 3 indicate whether each ballot was cast in person on election 4 day, in person prior to election day, by mail other than under 5 the provisions of the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens 6 Absentee Voting Act, by mail by a member of the military under 7 the provisions of the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens 8 Absentee Voting Act, or by mail by an overseas citizen under 9 the provisions of the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens 10 Absentee Voting Act. 11 2. The state commissioner of elections shall adopt rules 12 pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this section. 13